Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-319.03
Domestic companies; securities; deposit; minimum required.

Every domestic assessment association hereafter organized to transact the business of insurance in this state, except (1) health and accident assessment associations and (2) assessment associations organized primarily to write insurance coverage on farm properties against the perils of fire, lightning, windstorm, and hail, shall deposit with the Department of Insurance eligible securities for the benefit of all of its policyholders or policyholders and creditors in the United States equal to one-fifth of the minimum surplus funds required of domestic mutual insurance companies licensed to write the same kind or kinds of insurance.

Laws 1955, c. 174, § 3, p. 499;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 73;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 52.